Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1662.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 180.14 of Title 17, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Corporation Commission is hereby required to
prepare and submit an annual report detailing all activities and
actions undertaken by any representative of the Commission in
dealings with the Southwest Power Pool. The report shall include,
but shall not be limited to:
1. A detailed account of all trips taken by Commission
representatives in connection with matters involving the Southwest
Power Pool, including the purpose, location, and costs of such
trips;

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1662 Page 1

2. A record of all meetings attended by Commission
representatives with the Southwest Power Pool or its
representatives, including dates, locations, and subject matters
discussed; and
3. A comprehensive summary of all votes taken by Commission
representatives on matters related to the Southwest Power Pool,
including the nature and outcomes of such votes.
The report shall cover all relevant activities undertaken during
the preceding calendar year and shall be completed and submitted no
later than January 31 of each year to the Speaker of the Oklahoma
House of Representatives and the President Pro Tempore of the
Oklahoma State Senate.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 12th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate



ENGR. H. B. NO. 1662 Page 2